Utah statutes.
53B-23-105.   Infringement of copyright laws not authorized.

Nothing in this chapter shall be considered to authorize any use of instructional materials that would constitute an infringement of copyright under the Copyright Revision Act of 1976, as amended, 17 U.S.C. Sec. 101 et seq.

